Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 5. Tuition

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Absence from or inability to attend school or college as affecting liability for or right to recover payments for tuition or board, 20 ALR4th 303.

§ 21-4-501.
Payment of tuition for children resident in districts which maintain no high school; admission of children to high schools in other districts; state board approval for out-of-state placements; duties of admitting districts; tuition amount.

Any district which does not maintain a high school shall pay tuition, in addition to transportation or maintenance, for any child resident therein who has successfully completed the course offered therein and desires to attend high school, at any public school within or subject to the approval of the state board of education, without the state, which the district board may designate in the best interest, welfare and convenience of the child. Application for attendance at a high school outside the state shall be filed by the nonunified district board with the state department of education. If the nonunified district provides evidence that the amount of tuition assessed by the out-of-state district for the out-of-state placement shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the actual per pupil cost as determined under subsection (c) of this section, state board approval shall be waived under this subsection.

The board of trustees of any school district within the state which maintains a high school shall admit, upon payment of tuition, pupils of districts which do not maintain a high school; provided that nothing in this section shall be construed to require a district to admit nonresident pupils, when to do so would overcrowd the facilities of the admitting district or in any way work a definite hardship upon the educational program offered by the admitting district. The admitting district shall:

Include any pupil admitted under this section among its average daily membership (ADM) for purposes of computing the foundation program under W.S.

21-13-309

; and

Account separately for the portion of the tuition received pursuant to this section which is related to school buildings and facilities, as determined by the district and reported to the state department, and deposit that portion in its debt service account. The remainder shall be reported as revenues for purposes of W.S. 21-13-310(a)(ix).

The amount of tuition assessed under this section shall be determined by dividing the total operating cost of the district for the previous year, plus the cost of bond redemption and interest for the previous year, by the total of the district’s average daily membership for the previous year.

Subject to state board approval if an out-of-state placement as required under subsection (a) of this section, nonunified school districts shall be reimbursed from the school foundation program account for tuition paid under subsection (a) of this section as if the district’s total foundation program amount for that year as computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p) was increased by the amount of the tuition paid during the preceding year.

Any out-of-state placement under subsection (a) of this section shall include within the agreement with the out-of-state school district, that district’s agreement to provide student transcripts as required under W.S. 21-16-1308(a)(ii). The agreement shall also require the out-of-state school district to cooperate with the department of education to identify those courses provided by the out-of-state school district which satisfy the success curriculum requirements established under W.S.

21-16-1307

.

History.

Laws 1905, ch. 67, § 26; C.S. 1910, § 2076; C.S. 1920, § 2416; Laws 1921, ch. 22, § 1; 1923, ch. 64, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-530, 99-825; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-217, 67-927; Laws 1953, ch. 140, § 1; 1957, ch. 198, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-52, 21-197; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 67; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-67; 1999, ch. 110, § 103(a); 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 76, § 2; 2006, ch. 36, § 2; 2007, ch. 187, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interdistrict contracts for education of children with disabilities, see §

21-2-502

.

The 2006 amendment

added (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

The 2007 amendment

added the final sentence in (e.)

Laws 2007, ch. 187, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2006, ch. 36, § 6, states: “The scholarships provided under this act shall begin for students graduating from an eligible high school or a home-based educational program or receiving a GED after April 1, 2006 and shall be provided beginning with the fall semester 2006.”

School district reorganization plan held unlawful. —

State committee's school district reorganization plan, for the combination of existing school districts on Indian reservation into a single Indian reservation school district, which applied only to some Indians on the reservation, and which failed to provide for transfers by the excluded Indians into the newly created district, although the plan provided for transfers out to other school districts, was unlawful and arbitrary. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

No liability for high school tuition where pupils have not completed lower grades. —

Where pupils have not completed ninth and tenth grades before attending another high school district's school, the district of pupils' residence was not liable for the tuition of the pupils. State ex rel. School Dist. v. School Dist., 45 Wyo. 365, 18 P.2d 1010,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1933).

Nor where written transfer permission has not been given. —

Where pupils attend school in another district, the district of their residence is not made liable for tuition, where they do not have written permission for attendance in another district. State ex rel. School Dist. v. School Dist., 45 Wyo. 365, 18 P.2d 1010,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1933). See §

21-4-502

.

Permission of officials of district wherein pupils reside to attend high school in another district is essential to entitle other district to charge tuition. School Dist. v. Jackson-Wilson High Sch. Dist., 49 Wyo. 115, 52 P.2d 673,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1935).

Permission cannot be arbitrarily refused. —

Where district does not maintain a 4-year high school it cannot arbitrarily refuse permission for the pupils to attend high school in another district. State ex rel. School Dist. v. School Dist., 45 Wyo. 365, 18 P.2d 1010,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1933).

But school officials may select district with lower tuition. —

School officials may decide whether to send students to another high school where the tuition is less than in an adjoining county. State ex rel. School Dist. v. School Dist., 45 Wyo. 365, 18 P.2d 1010,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1933).

Residence of pupils. —

Pupils boarding in a high school district and returning to their parents' home in another district held to be residents of the abode of their parents. State ex rel. School Dist. v. School Dist., 45 Wyo. 365, 18 P.2d 1010,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1933).

The fact that pupils boarded with their mother in a district and returned to another district for the weekend made them residents of the latter district for the purpose of tuition. State ex rel. School Dist. v. School Dist., 45 Wyo. 365, 18 P.2d 1010,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1933).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Public payment of tuition, scholarship or the like to sectarian school, 81 ALR2d 1309.

Determination of residence or nonresidence for purpose of fixing tuition fees or the like in public school or college, 83 ALR2d 497, 56 ALR3d 641.

§ 21-4-502.
Attendance in another district when convenient or desirable; admission of pupils resident in other districts; attendance for ADM computations specified.

The board of trustees of every school district within the state may provide for the enrollment of any pupil resident therein in a school within another district if the pupil desires to attend the school and if attendance in such other district would be more convenient or is desirable because of services available in the other district. Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section, the district providing for the enrollment of the pupil in a school within another district shall not include the pupil within its average daily membership (ADM) for purposes of the foundation program under W.S.

21-13-309

.

Any district within the state may admit pupils resident in other districts of the state unless the admission overcrowds the classrooms of the admitting district. No district within the state shall be required to admit a pupil who has been suspended or expelled by the board of trustees or designated disciplinarian of any other district located in or outside the state. Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section, the district admitting a pupil under this subsection shall not assess tuition payments upon the district wherein the pupil resides, but shall include the pupil within its average daily membership (ADM) for purposes of determining its foundation program amount under W.S.

21-13-309

.

Any district within the state may allow pupils enrolled in another school district in the state to receive a portion of a pupil’s education pursuant to an agreement with the district in which the pupil is enrolled. The agreement shall be in writing with a copy kept on file by both districts. The district providing for the enrollment of the pupil shall include the pupil within its average daily membership (ADM) for purposes of the foundation program under W.S.

21-13-309

. The district providing a portion of the pupil’s education may assess the district providing for the enrollment of the pupil tuition for the classes the pupil attends. The tuition shall be equal to or less than the per ADM amount for the district providing a portion of the pupil’s education prorated to reflect the number of classes attended by the pupil.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 25; R.S. 1887, § 3937; R.S. 1899, § 542; C.S. 1910, § 1945; C.S. 1920, § 2249; Laws 1921, ch. 132, § 1; 1923, ch. 51, § 1; 1931, ch. 6, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-325; C.S. 1945, § 67-619; Laws 1957, ch. 199, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-127; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 68; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-68; Laws 1994, ch. 53, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 1999, ch. 110, § 103; 2016 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, inserted the proviso, “Except as provided under subsection (c) of this section” in (a) and (b), and added (c).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (c), which formerly read: “Any district within the state may allow nonresident pupils to attend to receive a portion of a pupil's education pursuant to an agreement with a resident district. The agreement shall be in writing with a copy kept on file by both districts. The resident district shall include the pupil within its average daily membership (ADM) for purposes of the foundation program under
W.S.

21-13-309

. The nonresident district may assess the resident district tuition for the classes the pupil attends. The tuition shall be equal to or less than the nonresident per ADM amount prorated to reflect the number of classes attended by the pupil. This subsection shall not apply if a pupil enrolls full-time in a nonresident district pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section.”

School district reorganization plan held unlawful. —

State committee's school district reorganization plan, for the combination of existing school districts on Indian reservation into a single Indian reservation school district, which applied only to some Indians on the reservation, and which failed to provide for transfers by the excluded Indians into the newly created district, although the plan provided for transfers out to other school districts, was unlawful and arbitrary. Wyoming. Geraud v. Schrader, 531 P.2d 872,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 423 U.S. 904, 96 S. Ct. 205, 46 L. Ed. 2d 134, 1975 U.S. LEXIS 3003 (U.S. 1975).

Notice of meeting. —

Action under provisions similar to this section was illegal where one member of board did not receive notice of time and place when and where action would be taken. State ex rel. Van Patten v. Ellis, 37 Wyo. 124, 259 P. 812, 263 P. 105,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1928).

Law reviews. —

For article, “School Finance Reform in Wyoming,” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1984).

§ 21-4-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 103.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 22, § 2, related to the amount of tuition to be paid to one school district by another for admitting a pupil.

§ 21-4-504.
Cost of maintaining pupil attending school outside district of residence.

A school district admitting a pupil from a nonunified school district in the state under W.S.

21-4-501

or providing for the enrollment of a pupil in a school within a school district in another state under W.S.

21-4-505

shall, in accordance with rules and regulations of the state department, be reimbursed from the school foundation program account for expenditures for maintaining that pupil in the admitting district for any length of time the pupil is required to reside in the admitting district. Reimbursement under this subsection shall be subject to and reported in accordance with rule and regulation of the state department and shall be administered as if the district’s total foundation program amount computed under W.S. 21-13-309(p) is increased by the amount of the expenditure for maintenance during the preceding year for a school district admitting a pupil from a nonunified school district in the state under W.S.

21-4-501

and in the current school year for pupils attending a school in another state under W.S.

21-4-505

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 25; R.S. 1887, § 3937; R.S. 1899, § 542; C.S. 1910, § 1945; C.S. 1920, § 2249; Laws 1921, ch. 132, § 1; 1923, ch. 51, § 1; 1931, ch. 6, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 99-325; C.S. 1945, § 67-619; Laws 1957, ch. 199, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 21-127; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 70; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-70; Laws 1973, ch. 84, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 501; 1999, ch. 110, § 103(a); 2017 ch. 31, § 1, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2017 amendment added the end of the last sentence, which reads, “for a school district admitting a pupil from a nonunified school district in the state under
W.S.

21-4-501

and in the current school year for pupils attending a school in another state under
W.S.

21-4-505

.”

Laws 2017, ch. 31, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

§ 21-4-505.
Payment of tuition for pupil attending school in another state; admission of out-of-state pupils.

Whenever it shall appear to the board of trustees of any school district within the state that instruction for any pupil residing in the district can be more advantageously or economically furnished by a public school maintained by another state, the board of trustees of such Wyoming district may enter into an agreement for the instruction of such pupils at rates of tuition specified in the agreement. The Wyoming district shall be reimbursed for the full amount of tuition assessed by the out of state district during the current school year subject to the following:

Effective school year 2017-2018 and each year thereafter, the Wyoming school district shall submit a report to the department of education in the manner and form and at times specified by department rule and regulation, documenting the number of pupils attending a public school maintained by another state and verifying payments to such districts for educational services;

From amounts appropriated by the legislature from the public school foundation program account for purposes of this subsection, the department of education shall distribute payments to eligible districts in accordance with this subsection on or before May 15 of the applicable school year, together with the district’s foundation payment under W.S. 21-13-313(c), if applicable;

The district shall not include a pupil attending a school within an out of state school district within its average daily membership (ADM) for purposes of computing its foundation program amount under W.S.

21-13-309

.

Any school district within the state may enter into agreements to admit pupils from out of state at the rate of tuition at least as high as the actual per pupil cost of the Wyoming district computed as provided in W.S. 21-4-501(c). The admitting district shall:

If it requires payment of tuition at least as high as provided under W.S. 21-4-501(c), include the admitted out of state pupil within its average daily membership (ADM) for purposes of computing its foundation program amount under W.S.

21-13-309

; and

Account separately for the portion of the tuition received pursuant to this subsection which is related to school buildings and facilities, as determined by the district and reported to the state department, and deposit that portion in its debt service account. The remainder shall be reported as revenues for purposes of W.S. 21-13-310(a)(ix).

Any out-of-state placement under subsection (a) of this section shall include within the agreement with the out-of-state school district, that district’s agreement to provide student transcripts as required under W.S. 21-16-1308(a)(ii). The agreement shall also require the out-of-state school district to cooperate with the department of education to identify those courses provided by the out-of-state school district which satisfy the success curriculum requirements established under W.S.

21-16-1307

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 103, § 25; R.S. 1887, § 3937; R.S. 1899, § 542; C.S. 1910, § 1945; C.S. 1920, § 2249; Laws 1921, ch. 22, § 3; ch. 132, § 1; 1923, ch. 51, § 1; 1931, ch. 6, § 1; ch. 81, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 99-325, 99-701, 99-827; C.S. 1945, §§ 67-219, 67-220, 67-619; Laws 1953, ch. 12, § 1; 1957, ch. 199, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 21-54, 21-55, 21-127; Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 71; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-71; 1999, ch. 110, § 103(a); 2009, ch. 169, § 1; 2017 ch. 31, § 1, effective February 17, 2017.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (c).

The 2017 amendment,

in the last sentence of (a), substituted “current school year” for “from the school foundation program account administered as if the district's total foundation program amount computed under
W.S.

21-13-309

for that year was increased by the amount of the tuition paid during the preceding year”, added “subject to the following”, and made a related change; added (a)(i) and (a)(ii), added the designation to current (a)(iii).

Laws 2017, ch. 31, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

§ 21-4-506.
Participation in activities by students not enrolled in the district; limitation on fees.

Any school age child who is a resident of a school district, who is not under suspension or expulsion by a Wyoming school district and who is not enrolled as a full-time student in the district in which he resides, shall be permitted by the district to participate in any activities which are sanctioned by the Wyoming high school activities association and which are offered by the district subject to the following:

The district may require the student to pay any fees for participation which are required by the Wyoming high school activities association;

The district may charge that student an additional fee for participating, but that fee shall be no more than any fee for participating charged to full-time students of the district. The district shall not require that student to pay tuition or to pay any other fees or charges as a condition of participation;

As a condition of participation, the student shall be required to comply with all other rules and policies of the district or any school activities association applicable to all students participating in the activity and not related to the assessment of fees or charges.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 110, § 502.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.